New York, session 2025-2026, A8217.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 114-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by 2 chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 114-a. Drug. The term "drug" when used in this chapter, means and 4 includes any substance listed in section thirty-three hundred six of the 5 public health law and cannabis and concentrated cannabis as defined in 6 section 222.00 of the penal law and any substance or combination of 7 substances that impair, to any extent, physical or mental abilities. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 9 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06130-01-5